Wyoming, session 2026, SF0044.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 6-7-101(a)(iii)(intro), (E), (H) and
(ix) and by creating a new paragraph (xiv) is amended to
read:
6-7-101. Definitions.
(a) As used in this article:
(iii) "Gambling" means risking any property for
gain contingent in whole or in part upon lot, or chance,
the operation of a in any game played with cards, dice,
balls or on any gambling device or contingent on the
happening or outcome of an event, including a sporting
event, over which the person taking a risk has no control,
but does not include any of the following:
(E) Any game, wager or transaction: which
is
(I) Incidental to a bona fide social
relationship;, is
(II) Participated in by natural
persons only;, and
(III) Conducted in a private manner,
at a private place or at a business or fraternal
organization for which the primary source of revenue of the
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0044
ENROLLED ACT NO. 38, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
business or fraternal organization is not derived from any
activity involving risking property for gain;
(IV) Not advertised or otherwise open
to public participation; and
(V) In which no person is
participating, directly or indirectly, in professional
gambling; receives any remuneration from facilitating,
participating in, hosting or organizing the game, wager or
transaction other than the direct realization of winnings.
(H) Raffles or drawings conducted for
charitable purposes in which one hundred percent (100%) of
the net proceeds remaining after payment of all costs,
supplies and winnings are used for charitable purposes;
(ix) "Profit" means benefit other than a gain,
which is realized or unrealized and direct, including
benefits from unequal advantage in a series of transactions
but does not include benefits of proprietorship or
management of a business wherein a game, wager or
transaction described in W.S. 6-7-101(a)(iii)(E) occurs any
financial gain;
(xiv) "Bona fide social relationship" means a
genuine social relationship between two (2) or more persons
wherein each person has an established knowledge of the
other. "Bona fide social relationship" shall not include a
social relationship which has arisen for the purpose of
gambling.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0044
ENROLLED ACT NO. 38, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
3